Virginia statutes. Title 3.2. Agriculture, Animal Care, and Food.
Article 8. Search, Seizure, Impounding, and Enforcement.

§ 3.2-6564.
Complaint of suspected violation; investigation.

Upon receiving a complaint of a suspected violation of this chapter, any ordinance enacted pursuant to this chapter or any law for the protection of domestic animals, any animal control officer, law-enforcement officer, or State Veterinarian’s representative may, for the purpose of investigating the allegations of the complaint, enter upon, during business hours, any business premises, including any place where animals or animal records are housed or kept, of any dealer, pet shop, groomer, or boarding establishment. Upon receiving a complaint of a suspected violation of any law or ordinance regarding care or treatment of animals or disposal of dead animals, any humane investigator may, for the purpose of investigating the allegations of the complaint, enter upon, during business hours, any business premises, including any place where animals or animal records are housed or kept, of any dealer, pet shop, groomer, or boarding establishment.Upon obtaining a warrant as provided for in §

3.2-6568

, the law-enforcement officer, animal control officer, State Veterinarian’s representative, or humane investigator may enter upon any other premises where the animal or animals described in the complaint are housed or kept. Attorneys for the Commonwealth and law-enforcement officials shall provide such assistance as may be required in the conduct of such investigations.

If the investigation discloses that a violation of §

3.2-6503

has occurred, the investigating official shall notify the owner or custodian of the complaint and of what action is necessary to comply with this chapter.

History.

1984, c. 492, § 29-213.76; 1987, c. 488, § 3.1-796.107; 1991, c. 451; 1993, c. 174; 1998, c. 817; 2008, c. 860.

§ 3.2-6565.
Impoundment; expenses; lien; disposition of animal.

When an animal control officer, humane investigator, law-enforcement officer or State Veterinarian’s representative finds that an apparent violation of this chapter has rendered an animal in such a condition as to constitute a direct and immediate threat to its life, safety or health that the owner or custodian has failed to remedy, such animal control officer, humane investigator, law-enforcement officer or State Veterinarian’s representative may impound the animal pursuant to §

3.2-6569

in a facility that will provide the elements of good care as set forth in §

3.2-6503

and shall then proceed to take such steps as are required to dispose of the animal pursuant to §

3.2-6569

.

History.

1984, c. 492, § 29-213.77; 1987, c. 488, § 3.1-796.108; 1994, c. 387; 1998, c. 817; 2008, c. 860.

§ 3.2-6566.
Preventing cruelty to animals; interference; penalty.

Each animal control officer, humane investigator or State Veterinarian’s representative shall interfere to prevent the perpetration of any act of cruelty upon any animal in his presence. Any person who shall interfere with or obstruct or resist any humane investigator or State Veterinarian’s representative in the discharge of his rights, powers, and duties as authorized and prescribed by law is guilty of a Class 4 misdemeanor.

History.

1984, c. 492, § 29-213.80; 1986, c. 362; 1987, c. 488, § 3.1-796.111; 1998, c. 817; 2008, c. 860; 2010, c. 240.

Cross references.

As to punishment for violations of this section, see §

18.2-403.3

.

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendment by c. 240 deleted “animal control officer” preceding “humane investigator or State Veterinarian’s” in the last sentence.

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Acts of cruelty. —

The question of whether there is an occurrence of an act of cruelty is a factual determination to be made by the animal control officer. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable Patricia S. Ticer, Member, Senate of Virginia, 08-068 (12/11/08).

Liability of officer. —

An animal control officer is entitled to immunity for actions performed within the scope of his official duties, provided such actions were reasonable and in good faith. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable Patricia S. Ticer, Member, Senate of Virginia, 08-068 (12/11/08).

§ 3.2-6567.
Enforcement authority.

All law-enforcement officers in the Commonwealth and State Veterinarian’s representatives shall enforce the provisions of this chapter to the same extent other laws in the Commonwealth are enforced.

History.

1984, c. 492, § 29-213.81; 1987, c. 488, § 3.1-796.112; 1991, c. 121; 1998, c. 817; 2008, c. 860.

Law Review.

For annual survey article, “Animal Law,” see 44 U. Rich. L. Rev. 185 (2009).

§ 3.2-6568.
Power of search for violations of statutes against cruelty to animals.

When an affidavit is made under oath before a magistrate or court of competent jurisdiction by any animal control officer, humane investigator, law-enforcement officer, or State Veterinarian’s representative that the complainant believes and has reasonable cause to believe that the laws in relation to cruelty to animals have been, are being, or are about to be violated in any particular building or place, such magistrate or judge, if satisfied that there is reasonable cause for such belief, shall issue a warrant authorizing any sheriff, deputy sheriff, or police officer to search the building or place. After issuing a warrant under this section, the magistrate or judge shall file the affidavit in the manner prescribed by §

19.2-54

. After executing the warrant, the animal control officer, humane investigator, law-enforcement officer, or State Veterinarian’s representative shall return the warrant to the clerk of the circuit court of the city or county wherein the search was made.

History.

1984, c. 492, § 29-213.82; 1986, c. 362; 1987, c. 488, § 3.1-796.113; 1994, c. 168; 1998, c. 817; 2008, cc. 543, 707, 860; 2014, c. 354.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2008, cc. 543 and 707 amended former § 3.1-796.113, from which this section is derived.
Pursuant to § 30-152, the 2008 amendments by cc. 543 and 707 have been given effect in this section as set out above, by deleting the last sentence, which read: “No search shall be made after sunset unless specially authorized by the authority upon satisfactory cause shown.”

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendment by c. 354 substituted “an affidavit” for “a sworn complaint,” “under oath before a magistrate or court of competent jurisdiction” for “to any proper authority,” and “magistrate or judge” for “authority” in the first sentence and added the two last sentences; and made minor stylistic changes.

§ 3.2-6569.
Seizure and impoundment of animals; notice and hearing; disposition of animal; disposition of proceeds upon sale.

Any humane investigator, law-enforcement officer or animal control officer may lawfully seize and impound any animal that has been abandoned, has been cruelly treated, or is suffering from an apparent violation of this chapter that has rendered the animal in such a condition as to constitute a direct and immediate threat to its life, safety or health. The seizure or impoundment of an equine resulting from a violation of clause (iv) of subsection A or clause (ii) of subsection B of §

3.2-6570

may be undertaken only by the State Veterinarian or State Veterinarian’s representative who has received training in the examination and detection of sore horses as required by 9 C.F.R. Part 11.7.

Before seizing or impounding any agricultural animal, the humane investigator, law-enforcement officer or animal control officer shall contact the State Veterinarian or State Veterinarian’s representative, who shall recommend to the person the most appropriate action for effecting the seizure and impoundment. The humane investigator, law-enforcement officer or animal control officer shall notify the owner of the agricultural animal and the local attorney for the Commonwealth of the recommendation. The humane investigator, law-enforcement officer or animal control officer may impound the agricultural animal on the land where the agricultural animal is located if:

The owner or tenant of the land where the agricultural animal is located gives written permission;

A general district court so orders; or

The owner or tenant of the land where the agricultural animal is located cannot be immediately located, and it is in the best interest of the agricultural animal to be impounded on the land where it is located until the written permission of the owner or tenant of the land can be obtained.

If there is a direct and immediate threat to an agricultural animal, the humane investigator, law-enforcement officer or animal control officer may seize the animal, in which case the humane investigator, law-enforcement officer or animal control officer shall file within five business days on a form approved by the State Veterinarian a report on the condition of the animal at the time of the seizure, the location of impoundment, and any other information required by the State Veterinarian.

Upon seizing or impounding an animal, the humane investigator, law-enforcement officer or animal control officer shall petition the general district court in the city or county where the animal is seized for a hearing. The hearing shall be not more than 10 business days from the date of the seizure of the animal. The hearing shall be to determine whether the animal has been abandoned, has been cruelly treated, or has not been provided adequate care.

The humane investigator, law-enforcement officer, or animal control officer shall cause to be served upon the person with a right of property in the animal or the custodian of the animal notice of the hearing. If such person or the custodian is known and residing within the jurisdiction wherein the animal is seized, written notice shall be given at least five days prior to the hearing of the time and place of the hearing. If such person or the custodian is known but residing out of the jurisdiction where such animal is seized, written notice by any method or service of process as is provided by the Code of Virginia shall be given. If such person or the custodian is not known, the humane investigator, law-enforcement officer, or animal control officer shall cause to be published in a newspaper of general circulation in the jurisdiction wherein such animal is seized notice of the hearing at least one time prior to the hearing and shall further cause notice of the hearing to be posted at least five days prior to the hearing at the place provided for public notices at the city hall or courthouse wherein such hearing shall be held.

The procedure for appeal and trial shall be the same as provided by law for misdemeanors, except that unless good cause is determined by the court, an appeal shall be heard within 30 days. Trial by jury shall be as provided in Article 4 (§

19.2-260

et seq.) of Chapter 15 of Title 19.2. The Commonwealth shall be required to prove its case beyond a reasonable doubt.

The humane investigator, law-enforcement officer, or animal control officer shall provide for such animal until the court has concluded the hearing. Any locality may require the owner of any animal held pursuant to this subsection for more than 30 days to post a bond in surety with the locality for the amount of the cost of boarding the animal for a period of time set by ordinance, not to exceed nine months.

In any locality that has not adopted such an ordinance, a court may order the owner of an animal held pursuant to this subsection for more than 30 days to post a bond in surety with the locality for the amount of the cost of boarding the animal for a period of time not to exceed nine months. The bond shall not be forfeited if the owner is found to be not guilty of the violation.

If the court determines that the animal has been neither abandoned, cruelly treated, nor deprived of adequate care, the animal shall be returned to the owner. If the court determines that the animal has been (i) abandoned or cruelly treated, (ii) deprived of adequate care, as that term is defined in §

3.2-6500

, or (iii) raised as a dog that has been, is, or is intended to be used in dogfighting in violation of §

3.2-6571

, then the court shall order that the animal may be: (a) sold by a local governing body, if not a companion animal; (b) disposed of by a local governing body pursuant to subsection D of §

3.2-6546

, whether such animal is a companion animal or an agricultural animal; or (c) delivered to the person with a right of property in the animal as provided in subsection G.

In no case shall the owner be allowed to purchase, adopt, or otherwise obtain the animal if the court determines that the animal has been abandoned, cruelly treated, or deprived of adequate care. The court shall direct that the animal be delivered to the person with a right of property in the animal, upon his request, if the court finds that the abandonment, cruel treatment, or deprivation of adequate care is not attributable to the actions or inactions of such person.

The court shall order the owner of any animal determined to have been abandoned, cruelly treated, or deprived of adequate care to pay all reasonable expenses incurred in caring and providing for such animal from the time the animal is seized until such time that the animal is disposed of in accordance with the provisions of this section, to the provider of such care.

The court may prohibit the possession or ownership of other companion animals by the owner of any companion animal found to have been abandoned, cruelly treated, or deprived of adequate care. In making a determination to prohibit the possession or ownership of companion animals, the court may take into consideration the owner’s past record of convictions under this chapter or other laws prohibiting cruelty to animals or pertaining to the care or treatment of animals and the owner’s mental and physical condition.

If the court finds that an agricultural animal has been abandoned or cruelly treated, the court may prohibit the possession or ownership of any other agricultural animal by the owner of the agricultural animal if the owner has exhibited a pattern of abandoning or cruelly treating agricultural animals as evidenced by previous convictions of violating §

3.2-6504

or

3.2-6570

. In making a determination to prohibit the possession or ownership of agricultural animals, the court may take into consideration the owner’s mental and physical condition.

Any person who is prohibited from owning or possessing animals pursuant to subsection I or J may petition the court to repeal the prohibition after two years have elapsed from the date of entry of the court’s order. The court may, in its discretion, repeal the prohibition if the person can prove to the satisfaction of the court that the cause for the prohibition has ceased to exist.

When a sale occurs, the proceeds shall first be applied to the costs of the sale then next to the unreimbursed expenses for the care and provision of the animal, and the remaining proceeds, if any, shall be paid over to the owner of the animal. If the owner of the animal cannot be found, the proceeds remaining shall be paid into the Literary Fund.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit the humane destruction of a critically injured or ill animal for humane purposes by the impounding humane investigator, law-enforcement officer, animal control officer, or licensed veterinarian.

History.

1984, c. 492, § 29-213.84; 1986, c. 362; 1987, c. 488, § 3.1-796.115; 1990, c. 322; 1992, c. 123; 1993, c. 119; 1994, c. 387; 1998, c. 817; 1999, c. 113; 2002, c. 500; 2008, cc. 510, 860; 2011, cc. 754, 886; 2019, cc. 536, 537; 2022, c. 614.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2008, c. 510 amended former § 3.1-796.115, from which this section is derived.
Pursuant to § 30-152, the 2008 amendment by c. 510 has been given effect in this section as set out above.
In subsection D, the second paragraph was added and, in the third paragraph, the clause (i) through (iii) designations and clause (iii) were inserted, “as that term is defined in §

3.2-6500

” was inserted in clause (ii) and clause (a) to (d) designations were substituted for clause (i) to (iii) designations.

Acts 2019, cc. 536 and 537, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act may result in a net increase in periods of imprisonment or commitment. Pursuant to § 30-19.1:4 of the Code of Virginia, the estimated amount of the necessary appropriation cannot be determined for periods of imprisonment in state adult correctional facilities; therefore, Chapter 2 of the Acts of Assembly of 2018, Special Session I, requires the Virginia Criminal Sentencing Commission to assign a minimum fiscal impact of $50,000. Pursuant to § 30-19.1:4 of the Code of Virginia, the estimated amount of the necessary appropriation cannot be determined for periods of commitment to the custody of the Department of Juvenile Justice.”

The 2011 amendments.

The 2011 amendments by cc. 754 and 886 are identical, and rewrote subsection A; added the first sentence and designator for subsection B; substituted “location of impoundment” for “disposition of the animal” near the end of the second paragraph of subdivision B 3; added subsection C designator and redesignated the remaining subsections accordingly; and rewrote the third paragraph of subsection F.

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendments by cc. 536 and 537 are identical, and substituted “clause (iv) of subsection A” for “clause (iii) of subsection A” in subsection A; and made a stylistic change.

The 2022 amendments.

The 2022 amendment by c. 614 added “except that unless good cause is determined by the court, an appeal shall be heard within 30 days” in subsection E in the first sentence at the end; and made a stylistic change.

Law Review.

For annual survey article, “Animal Law,” see 44 U. Rich. L. Rev. 185 (2009).

For annual survey article, “Local Government Law,” see 46 U. Rich. L. Rev. 175 (2011).